Connecticut, session 2026, SB00152.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. (Effective July 1, 2026) The sum of two hundred fifty
thousand dollars is appropriated to the Department of Housing from
the General Fund, for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, for
administration of the rental assistance program established in sections
8-345 to 8-346a, inclusive, of the general statutes, for purposes of hiring
additional full-time staff to inspect compliance of housing units with
state and local health, housing, building and safety codes pursuant to
subsection (b) of section 8-345 of the general statutes.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 July 1, 2026 New section
HSG Joint Favorable C/R APP
LCO 1204 1 of 1